New York, session 2025-2026, A6531.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 549 of the laws of 2005 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the county of Herkimer to impose a coun- 3 ty recording tax on obligation secured by a mortgage on real property, 4 as amended by chapter 332 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 7 deemed repealed on December 1, [2025] 2027. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10111-01-5